North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 34. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on the North Carolina State Lottery.

§ 120-295.
Creation and membership of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on the North Carolina State Lottery.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on the North Carolina State Lottery is established. The Committee consists of 14 members as follows:

Seven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least one of whom is a member of the minority party; and

Seven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom is a member of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2014-100, s. 5.2(h).

§ 120-296.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on the North Carolina State Lottery shall examine, on a continuing basis, the operations of the North Carolina State Lottery. The Committee shall make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve the operations and success of the lottery. The Committee shall do all of the following in conducting its examination of the North Carolina State Lottery:

Examine the administration, budgeting, and policies of the lottery.

Assess the lottery’s efficiency and effectiveness.

Review other state lottery policies and procedures to identify improvements and options for maximizing the transfer of lottery funds to the Education Lottery Fund.

Study any other matters that the Committee considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

History.

2014-100, s. 5.2(h).

§ 120-297.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on the North Carolina State Lottery. The Committee shall meet upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is five members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee shall receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Directors of Legislative Assistants of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

History.

2014-100, s. 5.2(h).

§ 120-298.
Reports to Committee.

Whenever the North Carolina State Lottery is required by law to report to the General Assembly or to any of its permanent committees or subcommittees on matters affecting the lottery, it shall transmit a copy of the report to the cochairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on the North Carolina State Lottery.

History.

2014-100, s. 5.2(h).